Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 2

Sale of Confiscated Motor Vehicles and Intoxicating Liquors

12-2-201. Sale authorized — Sales to governmental entities — Duties of the chief procurement officer.

The chief procurement officer is hereby authorized to dispose of at public sale, or to a governmental entity in accordance with the requirements of § 12-2-407, all motor vehicles and intoxicating beverages which have been seized and confiscated by any duly authorized agent, employee, or representative of certain departments and agencies of this state; to wit, the alcoholic beverage commission, department of safety, and wildlife resources agency, including any such seizure and confiscation made by any sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable of any county, when any such motor vehicle or intoxicating beverage shall have been used, owned or possessed in violation of any of this state, relating to intoxicating liquors, or shall have been used, owned or possessed in violation of any of the laws relating to narcotics and contraband drugs, or when the same shall have been used, owned, or possessed in violation of certain game and fish laws, the intoxicating liquor laws being chapter 49 of the Public Acts of 1939, as amended, and compiled in title 57, chapter 3, parts 1-4, as well as chapter 119 of the Public Acts of 1941, as amended, compiled in title 57, chapter 9, part 2, and chapter 50 of Public Acts of 1919, as amended by § 57-9-115, the narcotic and contraband drug laws being chapter 83 of the Public Acts of 1955, as amended, compiled in §§ 53-11-201, 53-11-203 and 53-11-204, and the game and fish laws being chapter 115 of the Public Acts of 1951, as amended, compiled in § 70-6-202.

Notwithstanding any provision of the law or this chapter to the contrary, in the sale of motor vehicles to governmental entities in accordance with § 12-2-407, it is the duty of the chief procurement officer to:

Determine the place of storage and the location of the sale of such motor vehicles;

Determine, in lieu of § 12-2-205, the fair market value of such vehicles to be sold;

Set the percentage of the sale price to be retained by the procurement office to defray the costs of administering the sale and such percentage may exceed the amount provided in § 12-2-207(a);

Enter notice of the intended disposal by public sale in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the disposal is to be made;

Include in such advertisement the manner in which interested parties can obtain information regarding the make, model, condition and options which may be on a vehicle; and

Post printed public notices in at least two (2) public places in the county in which the vehicle was seized and confiscated, with one (1) of the public places to be the courthouse; and

Promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this section.

For such sales, § 12-2-202(b) does not apply. Notwithstanding any law or § 12-2-208 to the contrary, any state, city or county officer, employee or such person's agent may buy or offer to buy motor vehicles when such purchase is in the name of and for the use of a governmental entity.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, §§ 11-32, 34-49; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 259, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A., § 12-219; Acts 1991, ch. 460, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a), (b).

Attorney General Opinions. Purchase of confiscated items by law enforcement officers or city or county employees, OAG 99-105, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 105 (5/10/99).

12-2-202. Public sale and advertisement.

Whenever any of such property as motor vehicles and intoxicating beverages has finally been forfeited to the state, or turned over to the state for sale and disposal, without further proceedings, and no court or other competent authority has ordered the property to be returned to the claimant, the chief procurement officer is hereby directed and authorized to proceed to sell the property at public sale for cash in conformity with this part.

In connection with the sale of such property, the chief procurement officer shall fully advertise the property to be sold in the manner provided in the following sections.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, provisions related to the manner of advertisement, the chief procurement officer is authorized to dispose of, by advertising on the internet and selling by internet auction, confiscated intoxicating beverages, confiscated motor vehicles and any other lawfully confiscated property.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-220; Acts 2008, ch. 882, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a), (c).

12-2-203. Manner of advertisement and sale of confiscated motor vehicles — Storage prior to sale.

Notice of intended disposal by public sale shall be entered by the chief procurement officer in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which disposal is to be made. The advertisement shall contain the manner in which interested parties can obtain information regarding the make, model, condition, and options which may be on the vehicle. Printed public notes shall be posted in at least two (2) public places in the county in which the vehicle was seized and confiscated, and one (1) of the public places shall be the courthouse. The advertisement shall give the date, time and place of the sale, and shall also contain information as to where the vehicle may be inspected prior to such sale. The day of the sale shall be held not less than seven (7) days nor more than fifteen (15) days from the day of the notice in the newspaper, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays. The sale shall be for cash and bids may be submitted in writing to the chief procurement officer at Nashville.

Whenever any motor vehicle has been seized and confiscated and is to be disposed of under this part, the chief procurement officer shall determine the place of storage and location of sale. The chief procurement officer is hereby authorized in the chief procurement officer’s discretion to appoint or designate some suitable person to hold or conduct the sale as authorized hereunder. The chief procurement officer or such person designated to hold the sale is hereby authorized to reject any and all bids which might be received when, in the chief procurement officer’s opinion, the bid received is not commensurate with the fair market value of the vehicle offered for sale, and, in such instances, the vehicle shall be readvertised for sale.

The property shall also be circularized to such persons, firms, and car dealers, who have indicated a desire to be notified when any motor vehicles are to be offered for sale.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-221; Acts 1992, ch. 713, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a), (d).

12-2-204. Manner of advertisement and sale of confiscated intoxicating beverages.

In connection with the advertisement concerning the sale of intoxicating beverages, the advertisement shall contain the manner in which interested parties can obtain information regarding the description of the beverages to be sold, the number of bottles, the size of bottles, and the brand name or names. The advertisement shall likewise contain the time and place of the sale and such a sale for intoxicating beverages shall only be held in a wet county.

The advertisement shall be for a period of not less than ten (10) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, by printed public notices posted in at least two (2) public places in the county where the beverages are to be sold and one (1) of the places shall include the courthouse. In addition thereto, a copy of the notice of sale shall be circularized and mailed to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the licensed retail liquor dealers in the city and county in which the sale is to be held. All persons submitting a bid for the intoxicating beverages shall be licensed to sell such intoxicating beverages in this state, and all bids received shall be in writing and the terms of the sale shall be cash.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-222; Acts 1992, ch. 713, § 3.

12-2-205. Determination of fair market value prior to sale.

Prior to the sale of any such property as herein authorized, the chief procurement officer shall determine the fair market value of the property to be sold.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-223; Acts 1992, ch. 713, § 4; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a).

12-2-206. Rejection of bids — Readvertisement.

Any and all bids received by the chief procurement officer for any of the property to be sold hereunder may be rejected by the chief procurement officer, and the property may be readvertised for sale when, in the opinion of the chief procurement officer, no bid had been received commensurate with the fair market value of the property offered for sale.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; T.C.A., § 12-224; Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 9(e).

12-2-207. Retention of administration costs — Disposition of remaining proceeds.

The state shall retain a fee for all property sold hereunder to defray the costs of administering this part. The amount of the fee shall be determined in the same manner as is authorized for the sale of state surplus property under § 12-2-411. The remainder of the proceeds shall be paid over to the respective departments and agencies of the state in accordance with the particular law under which the property was seized and confiscated.

When any intoxicating liquor has been seized and confiscated by a law enforcement officer of any county or municipality, the state shall retain a fee for administrative expenses. The amount of the fee shall be determined in the same manner as is authorized for the sale of state surplus property under § 12-2-411. The balance of the proceeds of the sale shall be paid over to the particular county or municipality served or represented by the arresting officer or officers making such seizure and confiscation, as now authorized under § 57-9-115.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-225; Acts 1992, ch. 713, §§ 5, 6.

12-2-208. Purchase by officer unlawful — Penalty for violation.

Except as provided in subsection (b), it is hereby declared unlawful for any state, city or county officer, employee or such officer's or employee's agent to buy or offer to buy any of the property to be sold hereunder except by bid at public auction during the tenure of such person's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter.

Any such person violating or attempting to violate this subsection (a) or subsection (b) shall be dismissed and discharged from such person's respective job or position, and shall forfeit any pay or compensation which might be due such person. In addition thereto, any such sale is hereby expressly declared null and void, and such person shall, in addition, forfeit all right and title in the property.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), it is declared unlawful for any state, city or county officer, employee or such officer's or employee's agent directly or indirectly involved in the confiscation of such property to buy or offer to buy any of the property to be sold hereunder. It is further declared unlawful for officers and employees designated by the procurement office, in accordance with applicable regulations of the procurement commission, to buy or offer to buy any of the property to be sold hereunder.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-226; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1998, ch. 1043, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(f).

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Purchase of confiscated items by law enforcement officers or city or county employees, OAG 99-105, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 105 (5/10/99).

12-2-209. Application of law.

This part is applicable to all motor vehicles seized and confiscated in any county or municipality in this state when the same has been used to store or transport intoxicating beverages in violation of the liquor laws of the state, and this part likewise applies to the seizure and confiscation of intoxicating beverages owned or possessed in violation of the liquor laws of the state, whether the beverages are stamped or unstamped, and this part applies to both wet and dry counties.

Acts 1959, ch. 303, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-227.